Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1141 Punishment of pupils limited.
No physical punishment of any kind may be inflicted upon any pupil, except as
provided for under sections 302A-1141.4 and 703-309(2). [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2;
am L 2014, c 206, §3]

Note

Report to 2018 legislature on department's progress in
implementing use of restraint statutes and expenditure of funds. L 2016, c
151, §1.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next